Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Sections 2 to 6 of this 2021 Act are added to  and made a part of ORS chapter
314.
SECTION 2. As used in sections 2 to 6 of this 2021 Act:
(1) “Distributive proceeds” means the  net income, dividends, royalties, interest, rents,
guaranteed payments and  gains of a pass-through entity, derived from or connected with
sources within this state.
(2) “Member” means a shareholder of an S corporation, a partner in a general,  limited
or limited liability partnership or a member of a limited liability company.
(3) “Partnership” means a syndicate, group, pool, joint venture or other unincorporated
organization, through or by means of which  any business, financial operation or venture is
carried on in this state.
(4) “Pass-through entity” means a partnership or S corporation  or a limited liability
company electing to be treated as a partnership or S corporation.
(5) “Share of distributive proceeds” means the portion of distributive  proceeds attribut-
able to a member of a pass-through entity in a tax year.
SECTION 3. (1) A pass-through entity may elect to be liable for  and pay a pass-through
business alternative income tax if all members of the pass-through entity are:
(a) Individuals subject to the personal income tax imposed under ORS chapter 316; or
(b) Entities that are pass-through entities owned entirely by individuals subject to the
personal income tax imposed under ORS chapter 316.
(2) The election to pay the pass-through business  alternative income tax is available if
consent is given by all members of  the electing pass-through entity who are members at the
time the election is filed or is made by any officer, manager or member  of the electing
pass-through entity who is authorized, under law or the  entity’s organizational documents,
to make  the election and who represents to having such authorization under penalties of
perjury. The election shall be made annually  on or before the due date, including extensions,
of the pass-through entity’s return, in  the form and manner prescribed by the Department
of Revenue. The election may not be  made retroactively. The members of a pass-through
entity may revoke an election under this section for a tax year only on or before the due date
of the pass-through entity’s return for that tax year, and only if the revocation is  agreed to
by all members who are members at the time of the revocation.
Enrolled Senate Bill 727 (SB 727-B) Page 1
(3) In determining the sum of distributive proceeds and computing  the tax under this
section, a pass-through entity shall add  back any amount of Oregon tax imposed under this
chapter and deducted by the  pass-through entity at the entity level for federal income tax
purposes under section 164 of the Internal Revenue Code.
(4) Each pass-through entity that  makes an election for a tax year pursuant to this
section shall annually report to each of its members, for the tax  year, the member’s share
of distributive proceeds and share of tax paid under this section and eligible for the credit
allowed under section 8 of this 2021 Act.
(5) The tax  imposed on a pass-through entity pursuant to this section shall be determined
with respect to the sum of each member’s share of distributive proceeds  attributable to the
pass-through entity for the tax year.
(6) The rate of the tax imposed by and computed under this section is:
(a) Nine percent of the first  $250,000, or fraction thereof, of the sum of distributive pro-
ceeds; and
(b) Nine and nine-tenths percent of any amount of distributive proceeds in excess  of
$250,000.
(7) The amount of pass-through business alternative income tax due from  a pass-through
entity in a tax year shall be exclusive of any amount of tax due and paid  by the pass-through
entity under this chapter, except as otherwise provided in sections 2 to 6 of this 2021 Act.
(8) Pass-through entities that have made an election under this section shall file an  en-
tity tax return. The return shall be accompanied by payment and shall be due on the  date
applicable to returns due under ORS chapter 316, as provided in ORS 314.385.
SECTION 3a.
The Department of Revenue may develop and implement a system providing
for the filing by electronic means of returns required under section 3 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 4. Except as otherwise provided in sections 2 to 6 of this 2021 Act  or where the
context requires otherwise, the provisions of ORS chapters  305 and 314 as to the audit and
examination of returns,  periods of limitation, determinations of and notices of deficiencies,
assessments, collections, liens, delinquencies, claims for refund and refunds,  conferences,
appeals to the Oregon Tax Court, stays  of collection pending appeal, confidentiality of re-
turns and the related penalties, and the related procedures, apply to the  determinations of
taxes, penalties and interest under sections 2 to 6 of this 2021 Act.
SECTION 5. (1) The Department of Revenue shall administer and enforce sections 2 to 6
of this 2021 Act.
(2) The department may adopt or establish rules and procedures that  the department
considers necessary or appropriate for the  implementation, administration and enforcement
of sections 2 to  6 of this 2021 Act and that are consistent with sections 2 to 6 of this 2021
Act.
SECTION 6. The net revenue from the tax imposed by sections 2 to 6 of this 2021  Act,
after deducting refunds, shall be paid over to the State Treasurer  and held in the General
Fund as miscellaneous receipts available generally to meet any expense or obligation of the
State of Oregon lawfully incurred.
SECTION 7.
Section 8 of this 2021 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 315.
SECTION 8. (1) If a pass-through entity, as  defined in section 2 of this 2021 Act, elects
to owe and pay the pass-through  business alternative income tax determined under section
3 of this 2021 Act, a taxpayer that is a member  of the pass-through entity shall be allowed
a credit against the taxes that are otherwise due under ORS  chapter 316. For each pass-
through entity of which the taxpayer is a  member, the credit allowed under this section shall
equal the member’s pro rata  share of the tax paid for the tax year under section 3 of this
2021 Act.
(2) If the amount allowable as a credit under this section, when added to the sum of  the
amounts allowable as payment of tax  under ORS 316.187 or 316.583, other tax prepayment
amounts and other refundable credit  amounts, exceeds the taxes imposed by ORS chapters
Enrolled Senate Bill 727 (SB 727-B) Page 2
314 and 316 for  the tax year after application of any nonrefundable credits allowable for
purposes of ORS chapter 316 for the tax year, the amount of  the excess shall be refunded to
the taxpayer as provided in ORS 316.502.
SECTION 9.  ORS 316.502 is amended to read:
316.502. (1) The net revenue from the tax imposed by this chapter,  after deducting refunds and
amounts described in ORS 285B.630 and 285C.635, shall  be paid over to the State Treasurer and held
in the General Fund as miscellaneous receipts available generally to meet  any expense or obligation
of the State of Oregon lawfully incurred.
(2) A working balance of unreceipted revenue from the  tax imposed by this chapter may be re-
tained for the payment of refunds, but such working balance shall not at the close  of any fiscal year
exceed the sum of $1 million.
(3) Moneys are continuously appropriated to the Department of Revenue to make:
(a) The refunds authorized under subsection (2) of this section; and
(b) The refund payments in excess of tax liability authorized  under ORS 315.174, 315.262, 315.264
and 315.266 and section 17, chapter 906, Oregon Laws 2007 , and section 3 of this 2021 Act .
SECTION 10.
Sections 3 and 8 of this 2021  Act apply to tax years beginning on or after
January 1, 2022, and before January 1, 2024.
SECTION 11. Sections 3 and 8 of this 2021 Act are repealed.
SECTION 12. The repeal of sections 3 and 8  of this 2021 Act by section 11 of this 2021
Act applies to any tax  year that begins on or after January 1, 2022, and before January 1,
2024, and to which section 164(b)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code is not applicable.
SECTION 13. The repeal of sections 3 and 8  of this 2021 Act by section 11 of this 2021
Act becomes operative  on the date on which section 164(b)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code
is repealed.
SECTION 14. This 2021 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2021
regular session of the Eighty-first Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate June 17, 2021
Repassed by Senate June 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House June 25, 2021
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 727 (SB 727-B) Page 3